Colorado, session 2026A, SB065.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Strengthening Economic and Environmental Decisions (SEED) Act".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-9-103, amend (3)
and (9.5); and add (4.5), (7.5), (8.2), and (13) as follows:
35-9-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 9, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture OR,
AS APPROPRIATE, THE COMMISSIONER'S DESIGNEE.
(4.5) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.
-2- SB26-065

(7.5) "FIELD CROP SEED" MEANS ONE OF THE FOLLOWING TYPES OF
SEEDS:
(a) ALFALFA;
(b) BARLEY;
(c) CANOLA;
(d) CORN;
(e) MILLET;
(f) OAT;
(g) RYE;
(h) SAFFLOWER;
(i) SORGHUM;
(j) SOYBEAN;
(k) SUNFLOWER; OR
(l) WHEAT.
(8.2) "INSECTICIDE" MEANS A PESTICIDE OR PESTICIDE-ACTIVE
INGREDIENT THAT IS DESIGNED OR INTENDED TO PREVENT, DESTROY,
REPEL, OR MITIGATE AN INSECT PEST.
(9.5) "Neonicotinoid pesticide" means any pesticide containing a
chemical belonging to the neonicotinoid class of chemicals, including:
(a) Acetamiprid;
(b) Clothianidin;
(c) Dinotefuran;
(d) FLUPYRADIFURONE;
(d) (e) Imidacloprid;
(e) (f) Nitenpyram;
(f) (g) Nithiazine;
(h) SULFOXAFLOR;
-3- SB26-065

(g) (i) Thiacloprid; or
(h) (j) Thiamethoxam.
(13) (a) "SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE" MEANS AN INSECTICIDE
CONTAINING A CHEMICAL DESIGNED TO BE ABSORBED BY PLANTS AND
TRANSLOCATED THROUGH PLANT TISSUE.
(b) "SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE" INCLUDES:
(I) ACETAMIPRID;
(II) CHLORANTRANILIPROLE;
(III) CLOTHIANIDIN;
(IV) CYANTRANILIPROLE;
(V) DINOTEFURAN;
(VI) FIPRONIL;
(VII) FLUPYRADIFURONE;
(VIII) IMIDACLOPRID;
(IX) NITENPYRAM;
(X) SULFOXAFLOR;
(XI) TETRANILIPROLE;
(XII) THIACLOPRID; AND
(XIII) THIAMETHOXAM.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-9-120, add (4) as
follows:
35-9-120. Prohibited acts - deceptive trade practice -
certification to use systemic insecticides on field crops - definitions -
rules - reports.
(4) (a) (I) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, A PERSON SHALL NOT
SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR OTHERWISE DISTRIBUTE FIELD CROP SEEDS
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE UNLESS THE BUYER
-4- SB26-065

PRESENTS AT THE POINT OF SALE A CERTIFICATE DEMONSTRATING A NEED
TO USE FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC
INSECTICIDE, WHICH CERTIFICATE HAS BEEN PROVIDED BY A THIRD-PARTY
VERIFIER APPROVED BY THE COMMISSIONER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(4)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(II) THE PROHIBITION SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (4)(a)(I) OF THIS
SECTION APPLIES TO IN-PERSON SALES, PHONE SALES, CATALOG SALES,
AND INTERNET SALES TO BUYERS IN THE STATE. WITH RESPECT TO
INTERNET SALES, THE POINT OF SALE OCCURS AFTER THE BUYER HAS
SELECTED ITEMS FOR SALE BUT BEFORE PAYING FOR THE ITEMS.
(b) (I) A PERSON MAY APPLY TO THE COMMISSIONER FOR, AND THE
COMMISSIONER MAY GRANT, APPROVAL AUTHORIZING THE PERSON AS A
THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER REGARDING THE USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED
OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE AS NECESSARY AND
APPROPRIATE. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT RULES TO ESTABLISH:
(A) QUALIFICATIONS TO ENSURE THAT EACH THIRD-PARTY
VERIFIER IS SUFFICIENTLY COMPETENT AND PROFESSIONALLY QUALIFIED
TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (4);
(B) THIRD-PARTY VERIFICATION APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS,
INCLUDING A REQUIREMENT THAT AN APPLICANT DECLARE IN THEIR
APPLICATION WHETHER THEY HAVE ANY DIRECT FINANCIAL CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST WITH SERVING AS A THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER; AND
(C) A THIRD-PARTY VERIFICATION FEE SET IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO
EXCEED THE COMMISSIONER'S DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE
COSTS FOR IMPLEMENTING AND ENFORCING THIRD-PARTY VERIFICATIONS.
(II) (A) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2029, A PERSON SHALL NOT
USE FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC
-5- SB26-065

INSECTICIDE ON AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY IN THE STATE UNLESS THE
PERSON HAS BEEN ISSUED A CERTIFICATE FOR SUCH USE OF FIELD CROP
SEEDS. A PERSON THAT SEEKS TO USE FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR
TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE ON AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY IN
THE STATE SHALL FIRST WORK WITH A THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER WHO HAS
BEEN APPROVED BY THE COMMISSIONER PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(4)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO DETERMINE WHETHER THERE IS A NEED FOR
SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE USE AS A FIELD CROP SEED COATING OR
TREATMENT BASED ON THE SPECIFIC CONDITIONS OF THE AGRICULTURAL
PROPERTY.
(B) THE APPROVED THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER SHALL COMPLETE A
PEST RISK ASSESSMENT OF THE AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY AND PREPARE
A REPORT SUMMARIZING THE ASSESSMENT.
(c) (I) (A) IF AN APPROVED THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER DETERMINES
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(b)(II) OF THIS SECTION THAT THE USE OF A
SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE AS A FIELD CROP SEED COATING OR TREATMENT IS
NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE ON AN AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY, THE
APPROVED THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER MAY ISSUE A CERTIFICATE VERIFYING
THAT THE USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR TREATED WITH A
SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE ON THE AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY IS NECESSARY
AND APPROPRIATE.
(B) THE APPROVED THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER SHALL NOT ISSUE A
CERTIFICATE AUTHORIZING THE USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR
TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE UNLESS THE VERIFIER
DETERMINES THAT SUCH USE IS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO
ADDRESS A DEMONSTRABLE PEST ISSUE.
(C) THE CERTIFICATE ISSUED BY THE APPROVED THIRD-PARTY
-6- SB26-065

VERIFIER MUST USE A STANDARDIZED FORM THAT IS DEVELOPED BY THE
COMMISSIONER AND MADE AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT'S WEBSITE.
(II) A CERTIFICATE AUTHORIZING THE USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE ON AGRICULTURAL
PROPERTY IS VALID FOR UP TO ONE YEAR. A PERSON MAY PRESENT THE
CERTIFICATE TO A SEED DEALER FOR THE PURCHASE OF THE COATED OR
TREATED FIELD CROP SEEDS WITHIN THAT ONE-YEAR PERIOD. THE
PURCHASER AND THE SEED DEALER SHALL EACH MAINTAIN A COPY OF THE
CERTIFICATE FOR FIVE YEARS FOLLOWING THE PURCHASE OF THE COATED
OR TREATED FIELD CROP SEEDS. AT ANY TIME WITHIN THE FIVE YEARS
FOLLOWING THE PURCHASE, THE PURCHASER OR SEED DEALER SHALL
FURNISH THE COMMISSIONER WITH A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE UPON
REQUEST BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(d) A CERTIFICATE AUTHORIZING THE USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (4) MUST INCLUDE INFORMATION:
(I) SPECIFYING THE AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY ON WHICH THE USE
IS AUTHORIZED;
(II) INDICATING THE REASONS WHY THE USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE IS NEEDED ON THE
AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY AND WHY SUCH USE IS EXPECTED TO BE
EFFECTIVE;
(III) INDICATING THE PERIOD, NOT TO EXCEED ONE YEAR, FOR
WHICH THE USE IS AUTHORIZED; AND
(IV) DETAILING ANY CONDITIONS OR RESTRICTIONS REGARDING
THE APPROVED USE, INCLUDING ANY RESTRICTIONS ON THE USE,
HANDLING, AND DISPOSAL OF THE FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR TREATED
-7- SB26-065

WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE AS A MEANS TO MINIMIZE HARM TO
POLLINATOR POPULATIONS, BIRD POPULATIONS, OTHER ANIMALS,
ECOSYSTEMS, OR PUBLIC HEALTH.
(e) AFTER USE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR TREATED WITH A
SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE ON AN AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY PURSUANT TO
THIS SUBSECTION (4), FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING DATA FOR FUTURE
PEST RISK ASSESSMENTS ON THE AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY, IN-SEASON
INSECT SCOUTING OF THE PROPERTY SHALL BE PERFORMED AND PLANT
EMERGENCE RATES FOR ALL LOCATIONS WHERE FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED
OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE WERE PLANTED SHALL BE
RECORDED.
(f) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2030, AND ON OR BEFORE JANUARY
1 EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, EACH APPROVED THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER COPIES OF THE CERTIFICATES THE
APPROVED THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER ISSUED IN THE PREVIOUS TWELVE
MONTHS, AND EACH SEED DEALER THAT SOLD FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED
OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE IN THE STATE AT LEAST ONCE
IN THE PREVIOUS TWELVE MONTHS SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER
COPIES OF THE CERTIFICATES RECEIVED IN THE PREVIOUS TWELVE
MONTHS.
(g) THE COMMISSIONER MAY ENFORCE THIS SUBSECTION (4) BY:
(I) ENTERING AND INSPECTING A SEED DEALER'S BUSINESS
PROPERTY:
(A) IF THE COMMISSIONER REQUESTS ACCESS TO THE BUSINESS
PROPERTY DURING REGULAR BUSINESS HOURS; AND
(B) IN ORDER FOR THE COMMISSIONER TO INSPECT ANY BUILDING,
EQUIPMENT, VEHICLE, OR RECORDS ON THE BUSINESS PROPERTY
-8- SB26-065

PERTINENT TO THE INSPECTION;
(II) SUSPENDING OR REVOKING A SEED DEALER'S LICENSE OR THE
COMMISSIONER'S APPROVAL OF A THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER IF, AFTER A
HEARING HELD ON THE MATTER, THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT
THE SEED DEALER OR THIRD-PARTY VERIFIER:
(A) FAILED TO ADHERE TO THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBSECTION (4) OR THE COMMISSIONER'S RULES IMPLEMENTING THIS
SUBSECTION (4); OR
(B) COMMITTED FRAUD; OR
(III) ASSESSING AGAINST A PERSON THAT KNOWINGLY OR
INTENTIONALLY VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION (4) A FINE IN AN AMOUNT NOT
TO EXCEED FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION. THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL CREDIT FINES COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (4)(g)(III) TO THE PLANT HEALTH, PEST CONTROL, AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
35-1-106.3 (1).
(h) COMMENCING IN 2030, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE IN
ITS ANNUAL "STATE MEASUREMENT FOR ACCOUNTABLE, RESPONSIVE,
AND TRANSPARENT (SMART) GOVERNMENT ACT" PRESENTATION MADE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-7-203 AN ANONYMIZED SUMMARY OF:
(I) THE CERTIFICATES SUBMITTED TO THE COMMISSIONER
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(f) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT'S IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SUBSECTION (4),
INCLUDING ANY INSPECTIONS PERFORMED OR SUSPENSIONS, REVOCATIONS,
OR FINES ISSUED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(g) OF THIS SECTION.
(i) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL
ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS SUBSECTION (4),
-9- SB26-065

INCLUDING RULES:
(I) CREATING A PROGRAM TO ENSURE THAT FIELD CROP SEEDS
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE ARE USED ON
AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY ONLY WHEN NEEDED AND EXPECTED TO BE
EFFECTIVE;
(II) REQUIRING RECORD-KEEPING AND REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
REGARDING THE USE, HANDLING, AND DISPOSAL OF FIELD CROP SEEDS
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE; AND
(III) AUTHORIZING THE DEPARTMENT TO GRANT AN EMERGENCY
EXCEPTION FOR THE SALE OF FIELD CROP SEEDS COATED OR TREATED WITH
A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE IN THE STATE IF THERE IS AN INSUFFICIENT
AMOUNT OF COMMERCIALLY AVAILABLE SEEDS THAT HAVE NOT BEEN
COATED OR TREATED WITH A SYSTEMIC INSECTICIDE.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-10- SB26-065